Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.560

Tampering with voting machines, devices—Unauthorized access.

Any person who tampers with or damages or attempts to damage any voting machine or device to be used or being used in a primary or special or general election, or who prevents or attempts to prevent the correct operation of such machine or device, or any unauthorized person who accesses or assists another person or entity with unauthorized access to a voting center, election office, ballot counting area, ballot storage area, or election system, voting machine, or device to be used or being used in a primary or special or general election, is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2024 c 28 s 8; 2003 c 111 s 2126; 1991 c 81 s 18; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.260. Prior: 1913 c 58 s 16; RRS s 5316. Formerly RCW 29.85.260.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.